src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-h12_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    glas+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: glas
    glas+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: glas
    glas+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: glasi
    glas+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: glas
    glas+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: gløs
    glas+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: gløs
    glas+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: gløsum
    glas+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: glasa
    glas+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: glasið
    glas+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: glasið
    glas+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: glasinum
    glas+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: glasins
    glas+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: gløsini
    glas+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: gløsini
    glas+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: gløsunum
    glas+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: glasanna
